Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 7

Metropolitan Hearing Officer Act of 1983

7-7-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Metropolitan Hearing Officer Act of 1983.”

Acts 1983, ch. 346, § 1.

7-7-102. Appointment — Salary and benefits.

The chief legislative body of any county having a metropolitan form of government is empowered to authorize the chief executive officer of the county to appoint a metropolitan hearing officer who shall serve at the pleasure of the chief executive officer.

The metropolitan hearing officer shall receive such salary and other benefits as may be provided by the chief legislative body.

Acts 1983, ch. 346, § 2.

7-7-103. Qualifications.

The qualifications of a metropolitan hearing officer are as follows:

A resident of the county, having been a resident for at least three (3) years immediately prior to appointment; and

An attorney in good standing and licensed to practice law in the state of Tennessee for at least three (3) years immediately prior to appointment.

Acts 1983, ch. 346, § 3.

7-7-104. Powers and duties.

The powers, duties, obligations and responsibilities of a metropolitan hearing officer are to:

Promptly hold a hearing on all matters appealed to appellate boards of the county;

Issue subpoenas as requested by either party in such matters;

Prepare a complete record of each hearing;

Make written recommendations following each hearing; and

Furnish each member of the appropriate appellate boards with a copy of the documents required in subdivisions (3) and (4) for their review.

Acts 1983, ch. 346, § 4.

7-7-105. Hearings by administrative law judges in certain counties.

In lieu of appointing a hearing officer as authorized in this chapter, any county having a metropolitan form of government and a population of over four hundred fifty thousand (450,000), according to the 1990 census or any subsequent federal census, is empowered to contract with the secretary of state for use of administrative law judges, duly appointed pursuant to § 4-5-102(1), on a case-by-case basis to conduct hearings on any matters appealed to boards and commissions of the county.

Any appeal conducted by an administrative law judge under this section shall be conducted substantially in accordance with the contested case provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, part 3. The board or commission that considers such appeals shall promulgate rules that specify the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act applicable to such appeals.

Acts 1994, ch. 678, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.